Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.196

Work-integrated learning advisory committee. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the employment security department and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall convene a work-integrated learning advisory committee to provide advice to the legislature and the education and workforce sectors on creating opportunities for students to: Explore and understand a wide range of career-related opportunities through applied learning; engage with industry mentors; and plan for career and college success.

(2) The committee shall:

(a) Assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in the development of an application process and the selection of local applicant schools to participate in the initiative established in RCW 28A.630.135;

(b) Advise the superintendent of public instruction on the development and implementation of work-integrated learning instructional programs;

(c) Review the instructional programs of projects funded through the career connect Washington program with grant moneys from the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, P.L. 113-128, related to work-integrated learning, a type of learning that is also referred to as "career connected learning," and of local applicant schools selected to develop and implement work-integrated learning project programs under RCW 28A.630.135. The purpose of the review required by this subsection (2)(c) is to determine:

(i) The impact on in-school progress, high school graduation rates, state test scores, indicators of career and college readiness, employment outcomes, and community partnerships. In accordance with this subsection (2)(c), and to the maximum extent practicable, the review must consider both overall impacts and reductions or other changes in opportunity gaps;

(ii) Best practices for partnering with industry and the local community to create opportunities for applied learning through internships, externships, registered youth apprenticeships, and mentorships; and

(iii) Best practices for linking high school and beyond plans with work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities and increasing college readiness;

(d) Analyze barriers to statewide adoption of work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities and instructional programs;

(e) Recommend policies to implement work-integrated and career-related strategies that increase college and career readiness of students statewide. Policies recommended under this subsection (2)(e) may include, but are not limited to: (i) Policies related to aligning career and technical education programs with statewide and local industry projections and career cluster needs evidenced through economic development data and appropriate longitudinal data; and (ii) the completion of remedial courses required by colleges and universities;

(f) Consult with individuals from the public and private sectors with expertise in career and technical education and work-integrated training, including representatives of labor unions, professional technical organizations, and business and industry; and

(g) Collaborate in the evaluation required by RCW 28A.630.155.

(3) The committee must, at a minimum, be composed of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(d) One educator representing the K-12 career and technical education sector, appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, as determined from recommendations of the association for career and technical education;

(e) One school counselor appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, as determined from recommendations of the school counselor association;

(f) One educator representing the community and technical colleges, appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges;

(g) One member of the governor's office specializing in career and technical education and workforce needs, appointed by the governor; and

(h) One member of the workforce training and education coordinating board, designated by the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(4) The committee shall convene a subcommittee that includes members representing manufacturing, industry, labor, apprenticeships, and other members with specialized expertise.

(5) The chair or cochairs of the committee and subcommittee must be selected by the members of the committee.

(6) Staff support for the committee and the subcommittee must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(7) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the state board for community and technical colleges, the state board of education, the student achievement council, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the education committees and economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate by July 1, 2022.

(8) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[ 2023 c 128 s 4. Prior: 2018 c 206 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 128: See note following RCW 28A.630.145.